District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.221

Transfer of personnel, records, property, and funds.

(a)

The personnel, records, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations and other funds which relate primarily to the functions of the Board of Architecture and the Board of Interior Designers are transferred to the Board of Architecture and Interior Designers established by this subchapter.

(b)

The personnel, records, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations and other funds which relate primarily to the functions of the Board of Accountancy are transferred to the Board of Accountancy established by § 47-2853.06.

(c)

The personnel, records, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations and other funds which relate primarily to the functions of the Board of Barber and Cosmetology are transferred to the Board of Barber and Cosmetology established by § 47-2853.06.

(d)

The personnel, records, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations and other funds which relate primarily to the functions of the District of Columbia Plumbing Board, the District of Columbia Refrigeration and Air Conditioning Board, District of Columbia Steam and Other Operating Engineers Board, and the District of Columbia Electrical Board are transferred to the Board of Industrial Trades established by § 47-2853.06.

(e)

The personnel, records, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations and other funds which relate primarily to the functions of the District of Columbia Board of Registration for Professional Engineers are transferred to the Board of Professional Engineering established by § 47-2853.06.

(f)

The personnel, records, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations and other funds which relate primarily to the functions of the Board of Appraisers are transferred to the Board of Real Estate Appraisers established by § 47-2853.06.

(g)

The personnel, records, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations and other funds which relate primarily to the functions of the Real Estate Commission of the District of Columbia are transferred to the Board of Real Estate established by § 47-2853.06.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.221.